test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ammwz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ammõz : # Noun 'boy/poika/poiss/мальчик' - full paradigm
# Heinsoo, Heinike 2015: Vadʼdʼa sõnakopittõja. Tartu-Helsinki. (88-89).
     ammõz+N+Sg+Nom: ammõz
     ammõz+N+Sg+Gen: ampa
     ammõz+N+Sg+Par: ammassõ
     ammõz+N+Sg+Ill: ampasõ
     ammõz+N+Sg+Ine: ampaz
     ammõz+N+Sg+Ela: ampassõ
     ammõz+N+Sg+All: ampallõ
     ammõz+N+Sg+Ade: ampallõ
     ammõz+N+Sg+Abl: ampaltõ
     ammõz+N+Sg+Tra: ampassi
     ammõz+N+Sg+Ter: ampaassaa
     ammõz+N+Sg+Com: ampaka
     ammõz+N+Pl+Nom: ampad
     ammõz+N+Pl+Gen: ampaijõ
     ammõz+N+Pl+Par: ampaitõ
     ammõz+N+Pl+Ill: ampaisõ
     ammõz+N+Pl+Ine: ampaiz
     ammõz+N+Pl+Ela: ampaissõ
     ammõz+N+Pl+All: ampaillõ
     ammõz+N+Pl+Ade: ampaillõ
     ammõz+N+Pl+Abl: ampailtõ
     ammõz+N+Pl+Tra: ampaissi
     ammõz+N+Pl+Ter: ampaissaa
     ammõz+N+Pl+Com: ampaika
